DI-146
DIAGNOSTICS - VARIABLE GEAR RATIO STEERING

DIASH-02

DTC C1552 / 52 DC Motor Power Source Voltage Mal-
function

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The VGRS ECU monitors PIG (motor power source voltage). If the ECU detects a malfunction, it turns on
the warning light, records the DTC and stops VGRS operation.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
C1552/52 The system checks that the IG voltage is 9 to 16 V, and the :\P/GRS Fuse ircuit
PIG terminal voltage is less than 6 V for 2.4 sec. ower source cired!
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DIAGNOSTICS - VARIABLE GEAR RATIO STEERING

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check motor power source voltage (PIG).

PREPARATION:

ON Record and clear VGRS DTCs.
PGND —()— PIG CHECK: _ _
Start the engine and measure the voltage between terminals

L PIG and PGND of the VGRS ECU.
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Check and repair charging system.

C
F17297
B > Check or repair harness and VGRS fuse.

2 Check VGRS for DTC C1552/52.

Is DTC C1552/52 present?

@

No fault detected.

YES> Replace VGRS ECU.

NOTICE:
Fault may be intermittent. Check harness and connectors carefully and retest.
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